test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-nekalcj_gt-norm.yaml
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалцакэхэюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалцакын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалцакыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалцакыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалцакыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалцакыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалцакыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалцакынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалцакыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/obl+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалцакыдоʼ      
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1: нэкалтархадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2: нэкалтархан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3: нэкалтарха
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1: нэкалтарханиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2: нэкалтархадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3: нэкалтархахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1: нэкалтархаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2: нэкалтархадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3: нэкалтархаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалтархав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалтархар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалтархада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалтархамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалтархариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалтархадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалтархаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалтархараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалтархадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалтархын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалтархыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалтархынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Aor+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдоʼ 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1: нэкалтархадамзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2: нэкалтарханась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3: нэкалтархась 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1: нэкалтарханинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2: нэкалтархадинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3: нэкалтархаханзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1: нэкалтархаваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2: нэкалтархадаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3: нэкалтархаць  
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалтархавась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалтархарась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалтархадась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалтархаминзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалтархаринзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалтархадинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалтархаваць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалтархараць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалтархадонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюнась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюнинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюнаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалтархахэюдонзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалтархынась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдась
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалтархынинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдинзь
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалтархынаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдаць
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/appr+Prt1+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалтархыдонзь       
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1: нэкалмэрхадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2: нэкалмэрхан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3: нэкалмэрха
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1: нэкалмэрханиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2: нэкалмэрхадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3: нэкалмэрхахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1: нэкалмэрхаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2: нэкалмэрхадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3: нэкалмэрхаˮ 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалмэрхадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалмэрхахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/perfappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмэрхыдоʼ  
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1: нэкалмандарахадмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2: нэкалмандарахан
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3: нэкалмандараха
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1: нэкалмандараханиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2: нэкалмандарахадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3: нэкалмандарахахаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1: нэкалмандарахаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2: нэкалмандарахадаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3: нэкалмандарахаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахав
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахар
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахада
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахамиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахариʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахадиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахаваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахараˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалмандарахадоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалмандарахахаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхын
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхынаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/futappr+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалмандарыхыдоʼ    
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1: нэкалманӈгабядмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2: нэкалманӈгабян
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3: нэкалманӈгабя
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1: нэкалманӈгабяниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2: нэкалманӈгабядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1: нэкалманӈгабяваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2: нэкалманӈгабядаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3: нэкалманӈгабяˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабямиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабядиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабяраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалманӈгабядоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюнаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcDu3: нэкалманӈгабяхаюдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg1+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабин
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg2+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабид
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScSg3+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабида
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu1+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабиниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu2+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScDu3+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабидиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl1+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабинаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl2+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабидаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/sup+ScPl3+OcPl3: нэкалманӈгабидоʼ 
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1: нэкалхавэдмʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2: нэкалхавэн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3: нэкалхавы
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1: нэкалхавэниʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2: нэкалхавэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3: нэкалхавэхэʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1: нэкалхавэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2: нэкалхавэдаˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3: нэкалхавыˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcSg3: нэкалхавэв
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcSg3: нэкалхавэр
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcSg3: нэкалхавэда
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu1+OcSg3: нэкалхавэмиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu2+OcSg3: нэкалхавэриʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScDu3+OcSg3: нэкалхавэдиʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl1+OcSg3: нэкалхавэваˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl2+OcSg3: нэкалхавэраˮ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScPl3+OcSg3: нэкалхавэдоʼ
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg1+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюн
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg2+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюд
     нэкалць+V+TV+Mod/hyp+ScSg3+OcDu3: нэкалхавэхэюда
